Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.005

Intent.

The legislature finds and declares that it is of importance to the people of Washington state to live in a healthy environment and to expect a minimum standard of quality in health care. The legislature further finds that the social and economic vitality of the state depends on a healthy and productive population. The legislature further declares where it is a duty of the state to assure a healthy environment and minimum standards of quality in health care facilities and among health care professionals, the ultimate responsibility for a healthy society lies with the citizens themselves.

For these reasons, the legislature recognizes the need for a strong, clear focus on health issues in state government and among state health agencies to give expression to the needs of individual citizens and local communities as they seek to preserve the public health. It is the intent of the legislature to form such focus by creating a single department in state government with the primary responsibilities for the preservation of public health, monitoring health care costs, the maintenance of minimal standards for quality in health care delivery, and the general oversight and planning for all the state's activities as they relate to the health of its citizenry.

Further, it is the intent of the legislature to improve illness and injury prevention and health promotion, and restore the confidence of the citizenry in the efficient and accountable expenditure of public funds on health activities that further the mission of the agency via grants and contracts, and to ensure that this new health agency delivers quality health services in an efficient, effective, and economical manner that is faithful and responsive to policies established by the legislature.

[ 2005 c 32 s 1; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 101.]